en: Vanilla yogurt drinks
fr: Yaourts à boire goût vanille, Yaourts à boire vanille, Yaourts à boire saveur vanille
hr: Pića s jogurtom od vanilije
lt: Vaniliniai jogurto gėrimai
nl: Yoghurtdranken met vanille
pt: Bebidas de iogurte de baunilha

en: Fruit flavoured yogurt drinks
fr: Yaourts à boire aromatisés aux fruits, Yaourts à boire goût fruits
nl: Fruitdrinkyoghurts, Drinkyoghurts met fruitsmaak

en: Strawberry yogurt drinks, Yoghurt drinks (strawberry)
fr: Yaourts à boire goût fraise, Yaourts à boire fraise, Yaourts à boire saveur fraise
hr: Napitci od jogurta od jagode
lt: Braškiniai jogurto gėrimai
nl: Aardbeiendrinkyoghurts

en: Raspberry yogurt drinks, Raspberry drinkable yogurts, Yoghurt drinks (raspberry)
fr: Yaourts à boire goût framboise
hr: Pitki jogurti od maline
nl: Framboosdrinkyoghurts

en: Yogurt drinks without sugar
fr: Yaourts à boire sans sucre
nl: Yoghurtdranken zonder suiker

en: Yogurt drinks with sugar
fr: Yaourts à boire sucrés
nl: Yoghurtdranken met suiker

en: Plain yogurt drinks with sugar, Plain drinkable yogurts with sugar
fr: Yaourts à boire nature sucrés

en: Flavoured yogurts, Flavoured fermented milk yogurt with sugar
bg: Ароматизирани кисели млека
de: aromatisierte Joghurts
es: Yogures de sabores
fi: Maustetut jogurtit
fr: Yaourts aromatisés, yaourt aromatisé, Yaourt aromatisé sucré au lait fermenté
he: יוגורטים בטעמים
hr: Aromatizirani jogurti
it: Yogurt aromatizzati
lt: Jogurtai su skoniu
nl: Gearomatiseerde yoghurts
pt: Iogurtes aromatizados
zh: 调味酸奶

en: Thermised milk flavoured yogurts
fr: Yaourts aromatisés au lait thermisé

en: Flavoured yogurts with UHT milk
fr: Yaourts aromatisés au lait UHT

en: Fruit yogurts, yogurts with fruits, Yogurt with fruits, Yogurt fruit flavoured, Fermented milk with fruits, Fermented milk fruit flavoured
bg: Плодово кисело мляко
ca: Iogurs de fruita, iogurs amb fruita
cs: Ovocné jogurty
da: Frugtyoghurt
de: Fruchtjoghurt, Fruchtjogurt, Fruchtjoghurts, Fruchtjogurts
es: Yogures de frutas
fi: Hedelmäjogurtit
fr: Yaourts aux fruits, yaourt aux fruits
he: יוגורט פירות
hr: voćni jogurti, voćni jogurt
hu: Gyümölcsjoghurtok, Joghurt gyümölccsel
it: Yogurt alla frutta
lt: Jogurtai su vaisiais, Vaisiniai jogurtai
nl: Vruchtenyoghurts, Fruityoghurts
pl: Jogurty owocowe, Jogurty z owocami
pt: Iogurtes de fruta, iogurtes com fruta
ro: Iaurturi cu fructe, Iaurt cu fructe
ru: Фруктовые йогурты, Фруктовый йогурт, Йогурт с фруктами, Йогурты с фруктами
sl: sadni jogurti, sadni jogurt
th: โยเกิร์ตผลไม้
tr: Meyveli yoğurtlar
zh: 水果酸奶

en: Yogurts with fruits and sugar
de: Fruchtjoghurts mit Zucker
es: Yogures con frutas y azúcar
hr: Jogurti s voćem i šećerom
it: Yogurt con frutta e zucchero

en: Yogurt with fruits and sugar, Yogurt fruit flavoured with sugar, Fermented milk with fruits and sugar, Fermented milk fruit flavoured with sugar, Dairy specialty with fruits and added sugar, Dairy specialty fruit flavoured with sugar
fr: Yaourt aromatisé sucré, Yaourt aux fruits sucré, Lait fermenté aromatisé sucré, Lait fermenté aux fruits sucré, Spécialité laitière aromatisée sucrée, Spécialité laitière aux fruits sucrée
hr: Jogurt s voćem i šećerom
nl: Yoghurts met fruit en suiker

en: Yogurt with fruits no 0% fat, Yogurt fruit flavoured no 0% fat, Fermented milk with fruits no 0% fat, Fermented milk fruit flavoured no 0% fat, Dairy specialty with fruits no 0% fat, Dairy specialty fruit flavoured no 0% fat
fr: Yaourt aromatisé aux fruits non allégé en matières grasses, Yaourt aux fruits non allégé en matières grasses, Lait fermenté aromatisé aux fruits non allégé en matières grasses, Lait fermenté aux fruits non allégé en matières grasses, Spécialité laitière aromatisée aux fruits non allégée en matières grasses, Spécialité laitière aux fruits non allégée en matières grasses

en: Yogurt fruit flavoured with sugar no 0% fat
fr: Yaourts aromatisés sucrés non allégés en matières grasses

en: Yogurts with fruits and sugar no 0% fat
fr: Yaourts aux fruits sucrés non allégés en matières grasses

en: Fruit yogurts with fruit chunks
de: Fruchtjoghurt mit Fruchtstücken
es: Yogures de fruta con trozos de fruta
fi: Hedelmäjogurtit hedelmänpalasilla
fr: Yaourts aux fruits avec morceaux
hr: Voćni jogurti s komadićima voća
hu: Gyümölcs joghurtok gyümölcsdarabokkal
it: Yogurt alla frutta con pezzi di frutta, Yogurt con frutta a pezzi
lt: Jogurtai su vaisių gabaliukais
nl: Vruchtenyoghurt met stukjes
pl: Jogurty owocowe z kawałkami owoców

en: Multifruit yoghurts
de: Mehrfruchtjoghurts, Mehrfruchtjoghurt
es: Yogures multifrutas, yogures de varios frutas
fr: Yaourts multifruits, yaourts multi-fruits
it: Yogurt multifrutti, yogurt multi-frutta
nl: Multifruityoghurts
pt: Iogurtes multifrutas, iogurtes de várias frutas
ro: Iaurturi multifructe, iaurturi cu mai multe fructe

en: Red fruit yoghurts
nl: Rood fruit yoghurts

en: Lemon yogurts
de: Zitronenjoghurt, Zitronenjogurt, Zitronenjoghurts, Zitronenjogurts
es: Yogures con limón, Yogures de limón
fi: Sitruunajogurtit
fr: Yaourts au citron
hr: Jogurti s limunom
hu: Citromos joghurtok
it: Yogurt al limone
lt: Citrininiai jogurtai, Jogurtai su citrinomis
nl: Citroenyoghurt, Citroenyoghurts, Yoghurt met citroen, Yoghurts met citroen
pt: Iogurtes de limão
ro: Iaurturi cu lămâie
tr: Limonlu yoğurt
zh: 柠檬酸奶